Maryland, session 2025, HB0878.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0878*

HOUSE BILL 878
Article – Environment
5–205.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “FACULTATIVE SPECIES” MEANS AN ANIMAL SPECIES THAT USES
VERNAL POOLS IRREGULARLY.
(3) “OBLIGATE SPECIES” MEANS AN ANIMAL SPECIES THAT DEPENDS
ON VERNAL POOLS AS A NECESSARY PART OF ITS LIFE CYCLE.
(4) “TYPICAL YEAR” MEANS A YEAR IN WHICH RAINFALL TOTALS
MEET OR EXCEED THE AVERAGE YEARLY RAINFALL FROM THE PREVIOUS 30 YEARS
FOR THE COUNTY WITHIN WHICH THE VERNAL POOL IS LOCATED.
(5) “VERNAL POOL” MEANS A CONFINED DEPRESSION THAT:
(I) HAS SURFACE WATER FOR AT LEAST 2 CONSECUTIVE
MONTHS BETWEEN NOVEMBER AND MAY IN A TYPICAL YEAR;
(II) EXPERIENCES A DECREASE IN WATER LEVEL TO 6 INCHES
OR LESS BETWEEN JUNE AND SEPTEMBER IN A TYPICAL YEAR;
(III) PROVIDES A PERSISTENT OR BREEDING HABITAT FOR
VARIOUS ANIMAL SPECIES, INCLUDING NATIVE AMPHIBIANS AND INVERTEBRATES
THAT ARE FACULTATIVE SPECIES OR OBLIGATE SPECIES;
(IV) CONTAINS LESS THAN 30% AERIAL COVER OF EMERGENT
VEGETATION WHEN FULL;
(V) IS PREDOMINANTLY OR PARTIALLY SHADED BY WOODY
VEGETATION;
(VI) IS LESS THAN 5 ACRES IN SIZE; AND
(VII) MAY HAVE INTERMITTENT, TEMPORARY CONNECTIONS TO
OTHER BODIES OF WATER.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO:

HOUSE BILL 878 3
(1) ESTABLISH PROTECTIONS RELATED TO THE PRESERVATION OF
VERNAL POOLS IN THE STATE; AND
(2) ESTABLISH PROTECTIONS FOR BUFFERS AROUND VERNAL POOLS
IN THE STATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.